California statutes. Water Code
(a) Each water purveyor that sells, leases, rents, furnishes, or delivers water service to a newly constructed multiunit residential structure or newly constructed mixed-use residential and commercial structure for which an application for a water connection, or more than one connection, is submitted after January 1, 2018, shall require a measurement of the quantity of water supplied to each individual residential dwelling unit as a condition of new water service. The measurement may be by individual water
 meters or submeters.

(b) Unless the water purveyor or local government is operating under an ordinance or regulation requiring individual metering, the owner shall be required to install and read submeters, unless the water purveyor agrees to install and read individual meters. 

(c) (1) The owner of the structure shall install submeters that comply with all laws and regulations governing the approval of submeter types or the installation, maintenance, reading, billing, and testing of submeters, including, but not limited to, the California Plumbing Code.

(2) This subdivision does not
 require a water purveyor to fund or assume responsibility for ensuring compliance with any law or regulation governing the approval of submeter types or the installation, maintenance, reading, billing, and testing of submeters and associated onsite plumbing.

(3) Installation of submeters shall be performed by one of the following:

(A) A contractor licensed by the
 Contractors’ State License Board who employs at least one journey person who has graduated from a state-approved apprenticeship program.

(B) A registered service agency that has registered with the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(d) A water purveyor shall not impose an additional capacity or connection fee or charge for a submeter that is installed by the owner, or his or her agent.

(e) This section shall remain operative until the date on which the California Building
 Standards Commission includes standards in the California Building Standards Code that conform to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 5.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 537.5.   Inoperative on date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

537.2.

(a) A final occupancy permit for a building shall not be denied by a local building official if water submeters or meters have not been installed for each residential unit as required by this chapter if the building owner can demonstrate either of the following:

(1) Water submeters have been ordered and were delayed by the manufacturer.

(2) Water submeters for the building were submitted to a county sealer and are awaiting approval for use.

(b) After issuance of the occupancy permit, the owner shall
 demonstrate that the submeters are installed in the building within 120 days of approval by the county sealer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 5.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 537.5.)
-------------------------------------------

537.3.

(a) This article does not preclude or preempt an ordinance or regulation that regulates the approval of submeter types or the installation, maintenance, reading, billing, or testing of submeters and associated onsite plumbing if the ordinance or regulation was adopted prior to January 1, 2013.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to preclude the adoption, and preempt the operation, of an ordinance or regulation adopted after January 1, 2013, that regulates the types of approved submeters, their installation, maintenance, reading, billing, and testing, and associated onsite plumbing.

(c) This article does not restrict the
 existing authority of a water purveyor, city, county, city and county, or other local agency to adopt and implement a program to promote water conservation that includes the installation of water meters and submeters, as required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 537.1, if the program is at least as stringent as the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 5.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 537.5.)
-------------------------------------------

537.4.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this article should not be construed to impose costs on any local government agency, except to the extent that the local government agency is a water purveyor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 5.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 537.5.)
-------------------------------------------

537.5.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 5.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Note: Delayed operative applies to Article 5, commencing with Section 537.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Water Districts [540. - 540.]

540.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a water district, as defined in Section 20200, may serve as an aggregator to facilitate direct transactions within the boundaries of the district in accordance with Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 330) of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code and charge a fee that is equal to the district’s cost for providing that service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 841, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Advance Payments for Habitat Restoration and Flood Protection Projects [550. - 550.]

550.

(a) The department and the board have discretion to provide advance payments to local agencies for projects that satisfy the following criteria:

(1) Have at least one of the following project
 purposes:

(A) Restoring habitat for threatened and endangered species under state or federal law.

(B) Improving flood protection.

(2) The project proponent has demonstrated, to either the department’s or the board’s satisfaction, a need for an advance payment.

(3) The project proponent has demonstrated, to either the department’s or the board’s satisfaction, that the project proponent is sufficiently qualified to manage the project and the project’s finances.

(b) For a project for which an
 advance payment is made pursuant to this section, the amount of funds advanced by the department or the board to the local agency at any one time shall not exceed 25 percent of the entire amount authorized to be provided under the funding agreement with the local agency.

(c) A local agency may deposit funds advanced pursuant to this section in its treasury. Any interest earned on advanced funds shall be applied to the project for which funds were advanced.

(d) Funds advanced pursuant to this section shall be handled as follows:

(1) The funds shall be spent within six months of the date of receipt, unless the department or the board waives this requirement.

(2) The recipient shall, on a quarterly basis, provide an accountability report to the department or the board regarding the expenditure and use of any advanced grant funds that provides, at a minimum, the following information:

(A) An itemization as to how
 advance payment funds provided pursuant to this section have been expended.

(B) A project itemization as to how any remaining advance payment funds pursuant to this section will be expended over the period specified in paragraph (1).

(C) (i) Whether the funds are placed in a noninterest-bearing account and, if so, the date that occurred and the dates of withdrawals of funds from that account, if applicable.

(ii) If the funds are placed in an interest-bearing account, information on any interest that has accrued and, if the money has been expended, how it was expended.

(D) An evaluation of whether the project is on schedule. If the project is behind schedule, the report shall identify what has caused the delay and actions taken or that will be taken to remedy the delay.

(3) If the funds are not expended, the unused portion of the grant shall be returned to the department or the board within 60 days after project completion or the end of the grant performance period, whichever is earlier.

(4) The department or the board may adopt additional requirements for
 the recipient regarding the use of the advance payment to ensure that the funds are used properly.

(e) In light of the state’s interest in projects to restore habitat for threatened and endangered species or improve flood protection, the department or the board may reduce or eliminate any retention that would otherwise be withheld under a funding agreement for which funds are advanced under this section.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Advance payments” means funds that are provided to a local agency before the local agency has incurred expenses in furtherance of a project described in subdivision (a) and that are provided by the department or the board to allow the local agency to fund the project on a cashflow basis.

(2) “Board” means the Central Valley Flood Protection Board.

(3) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 647, Sec. 1.   (AB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. WATER [1000. - 5951.]



PART 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS [1000. - 1126.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions and Interpretation of Division [1000. - 1018.]

1000.

As used in this division, “water” includes the term “use of water.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.

Nothing in this division shall be construed as giving or confirming any right, title, or interest to or in the corpus of any water.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.

This division shall not be held to bestow upon any person, except as expressly provided in it, any right where no such right existed prior to the time this division takes effect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.

As used in this division, “Water Commission Act” means Chapter 586, Statutes of 1913, as amended.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1004.

As used in this division, “useful or beneficial purposes” shall not be construed to mean the use in any one year of more than 212 acre-feet of water per acre in the irrigation of uncultivated areas of land not devoted to cultivated crops.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.

Nothing in this division shall be construed as depriving any city, city and county, municipal water district, irrigation district, or lighting district of the benefit of any law heretofore or hereafter passed for their benefit in regard to the appropriation or acquisition of water. Any right to the water of any stream which flows along a boundary of the State and which is the subject of an interstate compact to which the State is a party, to the extent such right relates to quantities of water which the United States has, under the authority of an act of Congress, contracted to deliver to any municipal corporation, political subdivision, or public district in the State, from
 storage constructed by the United States on any such stream, shall not be subject to any requirement or limitation provided by law relating to the time within which the construction of works for the use of such water shall be commenced, carried on, or completed, or within which such water shall be put to use, or relating to the continuity of use of such water; and water contracted to be delivered from such stream, shall be reserved to the contractor therefor without diminution by reason of the contractor’s failure to apply such water to use during any period, and shall not be subject to appropriation by any other than such contractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 230.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.1.

Cessation of or reduction in the extraction of ground water by the owner of a right to extract, as the result of the use of an alternate supply of water from a nontributary source, shall be and is deemed equivalent to, and for purposes of establishing and maintaining any right to extract the ground water shall be construed to constitute, a reasonable beneficial use of the ground water to the extent and in the amount that water from the alternate source is applied to reasonable beneficial use, not exceeding, however, the amount of such reduction. Any such user of water from an alternate nontributary source who seeks the benefit of this section, shall file with the board, on
 or before December 31st of each calendar year, a statement of the amount of water from such source so applied to reasonable beneficial use pursuant to the provisions of this section during the next preceding water year (November 1st to October 31st), and such user cannot claim the benefit of this section for any water year for which such statement is not so filed.

“Ground water,” for the purpose of this section and of Sections 1005.2 and 1005.4, means water beneath the surface of the ground, whether or not flowing through known and definite channels.

The term “nontributary source,” as used in this section, shall be deemed to include water imported from another watershed, or water conserved and saved in the watershed by a water conservation plan or works without which such water of the same watershed would have wasted, or would not have reached the underground source of supply of the owner relying upon this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 581.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.2.

Cessation of or reduction in the extraction of ground water, to permit the replenishment of such ground water by the use of water from an alternate nontributary source, is hereby declared to be a reasonable beneficial use of the ground water to the extent and in the amount that water from such alternate source is applied to beneficial use, not exceeding, however, the amount of such reduction. No lapse, reduction or loss of any right in ground water, shall occur under such conditions. Any such user of water from an alternate source who seeks the benefit of this Section 1005.2 with respect to the use of such water occurring prior to the effective date of this section, shall
 file with the board, within ninety (90) days from said effective date, a statement of the amounts of reduction in the extraction of ground water as the result of water from said alternate source having been so applied to reasonable beneficial use prior to said effective date to permit the replenishment of such ground water and said amounts shall be segregated and shown for each water year (November 1st to October 31st) during which such use occurred prior to the effective date of this section. Any such user of water from an alternate source who seeks the benefit of this Section 1005.2 with respect to the use of such water occurring subsequent to the effective date of this section, shall file with the board, on or before December 31st of each calendar year, a statement of the amount of reduction in the extraction of ground water as the result of water from said alternate source having been so applied to reasonable beneficial use during the next preceding water year (November 1st to October 31st) to permit the
 replenishment of such ground water. Such user cannot claim the benefit of this section for any water year for which such statement is not so filed.

The provisions of this section apply only as to the cessation of, or reduction in, the extraction of ground water within that area in this state defined by the exterior boundaries of the Counties of San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Ventura, Los Angeles, Orange, San Diego, Imperial, Riverside, and San Bernardino.

The term “nontributary source” as used in this section shall be deemed to include water imported from another watershed or water conserved and saved in the watershed by a water conservation plan or works without which such water of the same watershed would have wasted, or would not have reached the underground source of supply of the owner relying upon this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.3.

During the pendency of an action to adjudicate substantially all water rights in a ground water basin situated in whole or in part within the Tehachapi-Cummings County Water District in Kern County, and until the date of judgment therein becomes final, which finality may be subject to any reserved jurisdiction of the court, the failure by any owner of water rights in and to such ground water basin to pump or extract therefrom the full quantity of water representing such water rights which he may be determined to have had as of the date of commencement of the action, shall not result in a loss of any portion of such water rights. The provisions of this section shall apply to
 any such failure to pump or extract in any water year, calendar year, or other year ending after the effective date of this section, whether or not said action was commenced prior to that effective date.

This special provision is necessary because there are special and peculiar circumstances applicable to the ground water basins lying wholly or partially within the Tehachapi-Cummings County Water District. There are three such ground water basins, commonly referred to as the Tehachapi Basin, the Brite Basin and the Cummings Basin. The alluvial fill in each of said basins is very shallow when contrasted to most other ground water basins in this state. It is necessary to induce those pumpers who can possibly do so to reduce their pumping from the basins if sufficient ground water reserves are to be maintained for preservation of the existing economy until supplemental water is available from the State Water Facilities. Actions to adjudicate substantially all water
 rights have been filed as to each of those basins.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 833.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.4.

(a) Cessation of or reduction in the extraction of ground water, to permit the replenishment of such ground water by the use of water from an alternate nontributary source, is hereby declared to be a reasonable beneficial use of the ground water to the extent and in the amount that water from such alternate source is applied to beneficial use, not exceeding, however, the amount of such reduction. No lapse, reduction or loss of any right in ground water, shall occur under such conditions.

(b) Any such user of water from an alternative source may file with the
 board, on or before December 31st of each calendar year, a statement of the amount of reduction in the extraction of groundwater as a result of water from the alternative source having been so applied to reasonable beneficial use during the next preceding water year (October 1st to September 30th) to permit replenishment of such groundwater. However, failure to file such a statement shall in no way affect the right of a user to claim the benefit of this section.

(c) The provisions of this section apply only as to the cessation of, or reduction in, the extraction of ground water within that area in this state defined by the exterior boundaries of every county, except the Counties of San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Ventura, Los Angeles, Orange, San Diego, Imperial, Riverside, and San Bernardino.

(d) The term “nontributary source,” as used in this section, shall be deemed to include
 water imported from another watershed or water conserved and saved in the watershed by a water conservation plan or works without which such water of the same watershed would have wasted, or would not have reached the underground source of supply of the owner relying upon this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.

Nothing in this division affects or limits in any manner whatsoever the right or power of any municipality which, prior to December 19, 1914, had appropriated or acquired water for municipal purposes, to use, sell, or otherwise dispose of such water either within or without its limits for domestic, irrigation, or other purposes in accordance with laws in effect on that date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1007.

Nothing in this division shall be construed to deprive the State or any city, city and county, municipal water district, irrigation district, lighting district, political subdivision, or any person of any rights to acquire property by eminent domain proceedings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1008.

Nothing in this division shall be construed as depriving any person of the right of appeal conferred under the laws of this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1009.

Any supplier of water in this state for municipal use, including the state, or any city, county, city and county, district, individual, partnership, corporation, or any other entity, may undertake a water conservation program to reduce water use and may require, as a condition of new service, that reasonable water-saving devices and water reclamation devices be installed to reduce water use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1009.5.

(a) A water district and the district attorney of any county in which the water district is located may enter into an agreement authorizing the attorney for the water district to act as a special prosecutor appointed by and under the supervision and direction of the district attorney for the purpose of prosecuting a violation of an ordinance of the district or a violation of a statute that is a misdemeanor or an infraction, or a violation of a resolution or ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 375, subject to all of the following
 limitations:

(1) The ordinance, resolution, or statute relates to water pollution, including waste water and stormwater, or to water conservation.

(2) The district attorney shall prescribe the scope of, and any limitations on, the subpoena power of the attorney for the water district.

(3) The district attorney may designate any ordinance, resolution, or statute that the attorney for the water district is authorized to prosecute.

(b) A water district, for purposes of this section, means a water district as defined in Section 20200.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 766, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1010.

(a) (1) The cessation of, or reduction in, the use of water under any existing right regardless of the basis of right, as the result of the use of recycled water, desalinated water, or water polluted by waste to a degree which unreasonably affects the water for other beneficial uses, is deemed equivalent to, and for purposes of maintaining any right shall be construed to constitute, a reasonable beneficial use of water to the extent and in the amount that the recycled, desalinated, or polluted water is being used not
 exceeding, however, the amount of such reduction.

(2) No lapse, reduction, or loss of any existing right shall occur under a cessation of, or reduction in, the use of water pursuant to this subdivision, and, to the extent and in the amount that recycled, desalinated, or polluted water is used in lieu of water appropriated by a permittee pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1375) of Part 2, the board shall not reduce the appropriation authorized in the user’s permit.

(3) The use of recycled, desalinated, or polluted water constitutes good cause under Section 1398 to extend the period specified in a permit for application of appropriated water to beneficial use to the extent and in the amount that recycled, desalinated, or polluted water is used. The extension by the board shall be granted upon the same terms as are set forth in the user’s permit, and for a period
 sufficient to enable the permittee to perfect his appropriation, while continuing to use recycled, desalinated, or polluted water.

(4) The board, in issuing a license pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1610) of Chapter 9 of Part 2, shall not reduce the appropriation authorized by permit, to the extent and in the amount that reduction in a permittee’s use, during the perfection period, including any extension as provided in this section, has resulted from the use of recycled, desalinated, or polluted water in lieu of the permittee’s authorized appropriation.

(5) The board may require any user of water who seeks the benefit of this section to file periodic reports describing the extent and amount of the use of recycled, desalinated, or polluted water. To the maximum extent possible, the reports shall be made a part of other reports required by the board relating to the
 use of water.

(6) For purposes of this section, the term “recycled water” has the same meaning as in Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000).

(b) Water, or the right to the use of water, the use of which has ceased or been reduced as the result of the use of recycled, desalinated, or polluted water as described in subdivision (a), may be sold, leased, exchanged, or otherwise transferred pursuant to any provision of law relating to the transfer of water or water rights, including, but not limited to, provisions of law governing any change in point of diversion, place of use, and purpose of use due to the transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1011.

(a) When any person entitled to the use of water under an appropriative right fails to use all or any part of the water because of water conservation efforts, any cessation or reduction in the use of the appropriated water shall be deemed equivalent to a reasonable beneficial use of water to the extent of the cessation or reduction in use. No forfeiture of the appropriative right to the water conserved shall occur upon the lapse of the forfeiture period applicable to water appropriated pursuant to the Water Commission Act or this code or the
 forfeiture period applicable to water appropriated prior to December 19, 1914.

The board may require that any user of water who seeks the benefit of this section file periodic reports describing the extent and amount of the reduction in water use due to water conservation efforts. To the maximum extent possible, the reports shall be made a part of other reports required by the board relating to the use of water. Failure to file the reports shall deprive the user of water of the benefits of this section.

For purposes of this section, the term “water conservation” shall mean the use of less water to accomplish the same purpose or purposes of use allowed under the existing appropriative right. Where water appropriated for irrigation purposes is not used as a result of temporary land fallowing or crop rotation, the reduced usage shall be deemed water conservation for purposes of this section. For the purpose of this section,
 “land fallowing” and “crop rotation” mean those respective land practices, involving the nonuse of water, used in the course of normal and customary agricultural production to maintain or promote the productivity of agricultural land.

(b) Water, or the right to the use of water, the use of which has ceased or been reduced as the result of water conservation efforts as described in subdivision (a), may be sold, leased, exchanged, or otherwise transferred pursuant to any provision of law relating to the transfer of water or water rights, including, but not limited to, provisions of law governing any change in point of diversion, place of use, and purpose of use due to the transfer.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon the completion of the term of a water transfer agreement, or the right to the use of that water, that is available as a result of water conservation
 efforts described in subdivision (a), the right to the use of the water shall revert to the transferor as if the water transfer had not been undertaken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 938, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1011.5.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the growing water needs of the state require the use of water in an efficient manner and that the efficient use of water requires certainty in the definition of property rights to the use of water. The Legislature further declares that it is the policy of this state to encourage conjunctive use of surface water and groundwater supplies and to make surface water available for other beneficial uses. The Legislature recognizes that the substantial investments that may be necessary to implement
 and maintain a conjunctive use program require certainty in the continued right to the use of alternate water supplies.

(b) When any holder of an appropriative right fails to use all or any part of the water as a result of conjunctive use of surface water and groundwater involving the substitution of an alternate supply for the unused portion of the surface water, any cessation of, or reduction in, the use of the appropriated water shall be deemed equivalent to a reasonable and beneficial use of water to the extent of the cessation of, or reduction in, use, and to the same extent as the appropriated water was put to reasonable and beneficial use by that person. No forfeiture of the appropriative right to the water for which an alternate supply is substituted shall occur upon the lapse of the forfeiture period applicable to water appropriated pursuant to the Water Commission Act or this code or the forfeiture period applicable to water
 appropriated prior to December 19, 1914.

The state board may require any holder of an appropriative right who seeks the benefit of this section to file periodic reports describing the extent and amount of the reduction in water use due to substitution of an alternate supply. To the maximum extent possible, the reports shall be made a part of other reports required by the state board relating to the use of water. Failure to file the reports shall deprive the user of water of the benefits of this section.

(c) Substitution of an alternate supply may be made only if the extraction of the alternate supply conforms to all requirements imposed pursuant to an adjudication of the groundwater basin, if applicable, and meets one of the following conditions:

(1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), is from a groundwater basin for which the operating
 safe yield is not exceeded prior to the extraction of the alternate supply and does not cause the operating safe yield of the groundwater basin from which the alternate supply is obtained to be exceeded.

(2) Is from the Eastern San Joaquin County Basin, as described on pages 38 and 39 of the Department of Water Resources Bulletin No. 118-80, for which the operating safe yield is exceeded prior to the extraction of the alternative supply, if all of the following requirements are met:

(A) The conjunctive use program is operated in accordance with a local groundwater management program that complies with the requirements of this section.

(B) The groundwater management program establishes requirements for the extraction of groundwater and is approved by a joint powers authority that meets the requirements of subparagraph
 (C).

(C) The joint powers authority includes one or more of the water agencies overlying the contemplated points of groundwater extraction and one or more of the water agencies that will share in the benefits to be derived from the local groundwater management program.

(D) By either of the following methods, the overdraft of the groundwater basin underlying the point of extraction has been reduced prior to the commencement of extraction:

(i) Elimination of a volume of existing groundwater extractions in excess of the proposed new extraction.

(ii) Recharge of the groundwater basin with a volume of water in excess of the proposed new extraction.

(E) The operation of that conjunctive use
 program ensures that the overdraft of the groundwater basin continues to be reduced.

(d) Water, or the right to the use of water, the use of which has ceased or been reduced as the result of conjunctive use of surface water and groundwater involving substitution of an alternate supply, as described in subdivisions (b) and (c), may be sold, leased, exchanged, or otherwise transferred pursuant to any provision of law relating to the transfer of water or water rights, including, but not limited to, provisions of law governing any change in point of diversion, place of use, and purpose of use due to the transfer.

(e) As used in this section, “substitution of an alternate supply” means replacement of water diverted under an appropriative right by the substitution of an equivalent amount of groundwater.

(f) This section
 does not apply to the Santa Ana River watershed.

(g) This section does not apply in any area where groundwater pumping causes, or threatens to cause, a violation of water quality objectives or an unreasonable effect on beneficial uses established in a water quality control plan adopted or approved by the state board pursuant to, and to the extent authorized by, Section 13170 or 13245, which designates areas where groundwater pumping causes, or threatens to cause, a violation of water quality objectives or an unreasonable effect on beneficial uses.

(h) This section shall not be construed to increase or decrease the jurisdiction of the state board over groundwater resources, or to confer on the state board jurisdiction over groundwater basins over which it does not have jurisdiction pursuant to other provisions of law.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 779, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2003, Ch. 740, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1012.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, where any person, public agency, or agency of the United States undertakes any water conservation effort, either separately or jointly with others entitled to delivery of water from the Colorado River under contracts with the United States, which results in reduced use of Colorado River water within the Imperial Irrigation District, no forfeiture, dimunition, or impairment of the right to use the water conserved shall occur, except as set forth in the agreements between the parties and the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 429, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1013.

(a) The Imperial Irrigation District, acting under a contract with the United States for diversion and use of Colorado River water or pursuant to the California Constitution or to this chapter, or complying with an order of the Secretary of the Interior, a court, or the board, to reduce through conservation measures, the volume of the flow of water directly or indirectly into the Salton Sea, shall not be held liable for any effects to the Salton Sea or its bordering area resulting from the conservation measures.

(b) For the purposes of this section, and during the term of the Quantification Settlement Agreement as defined in subdivision (a) of Chapter 617 of the Statutes of 2002, “land fallowing conservation measures” means the generation of water to be made available for transfer or for environmental mitigation purposes by fallowing land or removing land from agricultural production regardless of whether the fallowing or removal from agricultural production is temporary or long term, and regardless of whether it occurs in the course of normal and customary agricultural production, if both of the following apply:

(1) The measure is part of a land fallowing conservation plan that includes mitigation provisions adopted by the Board of Directors of the Imperial Irrigation District.

(2) Before the Imperial Irrigation District
 adopts a land fallowing conservation plan, the district shall consult with the Board of Supervisors of the County of Imperial and obtain the board’s assessment of whether the proposed land fallowing conservation plan includes adequate measures to avoid or mitigate unreasonable economic or environmental impacts in the County of Imperial.

(c) In order to minimize impacts on the environment, during the term of the Quantification Settlement Agreement and for six years thereafter, in any evaluation or assessment of the Imperial Irrigation District’s use of water, it shall be conclusively presumed that any water conserved, or used for mitigation purposes, through land fallowing conservation measures has been conserved in the same volume as if conserved by efficiency improvements, such as by reducing canal seepage, canal spills, or surface or subsurface runoff from irrigation fields.

(d) If a party to the Quantification Settlement Agreement engages in water efficiency conservation measures or land fallowing conservation measures to carry out a Quantification Settlement Agreement transfer or to mitigate the environmental impacts of a Quantification Settlement Agreement transfer, there may be no forfeiture, diminution, or impairment of the right of that party to use of the water conserved.

(e) During the period that the Quantification Settlement Agreement is in effect and the Imperial Irrigation District is meeting its water delivery obligations under the Quantification Settlement Agreement and its water delivery obligations under subdivision (c) of Section 2081.7 of the Fish and Game Code, no person or local agency, as defined in Section 21062 of the Public Resources Code, may seek to obtain additional conserved Colorado River water from the district, voluntarily or involuntarily, until the district has adopted
 a resolution offering to make conserved Colorado River water available.

(f) During the initial term in which the Quantification Settlement Agreement is in effect, any water transferred by the Imperial Irrigation District shall be subject to an ecosystem restoration fee established by the Department of Fish and Game, in consultation with the board, to cover the proportional impacts to the Salton Sea of the additional water transfer. The fee shall not exceed 10 percent of the amount of any compensation received for the transfer of the water. The fee shall be deposited in the Salton Sea Restoration Fund. This fee shall not apply to the following transfers:

(1) Transfers to meet water delivery obligations under the Quantification Settlement Agreement and related agreements, as defined in that agreement.

(2) Transfers to
 comply with subdivision (c) of Section 2081.7 of the Fish and Game Code.

(3) Transfers pursuant to a Defensive Transfer Agreement as defined in the Agreement for Acquisition of Conserved Water between the Imperial Irrigation District and the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California.

(g) Subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (f) shall not become operative unless the parties have executed the Quantification Settlement Agreement on or before October 12, 2003.

(h) This section may not be construed to exempt the Imperial Irrigation District from any requirement established under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).
